Arkansas, session 2025, HB1809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-3-306(a)(2), concerning the property tax
exemption for disabled veterans and the surviving spouses and minor dependent
children of disabled veterans, is amended to read as follows:
(2) As used in this section:
(A)(i) “Homestead” means the:
(i)(a) Dwelling that a disabled veteran,
surviving spouse of a disabled veteran, or minor dependent child of a
disabled veteran occupies as his or her principal place of residence; and
*JLL307*
04-02-2025 09:58:19 JLL307

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1809
(ii)(b) Up to forty (40) acres of real
property contiguous to the dwelling under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i)
(a)(2)(A)(i)(a) of this section if the contiguous property is not being used
for a commercial purpose.
(ii) "Homestead" includes a dwelling and real
property contiguous to the dwelling that:
(a) Meets the requirements of subdivision
(a)(2)(A)(i) of this section; and
(b) Is owned by:
(1) A revocable trust formed by the
disabled veteran who uses the dwelling as his or her principal place of
residence;
(2) An irrevocable trust of which the
disabled veteran who uses the dwelling as his or her principal place of
residence is a beneficiary; or
(3) A limited liability company, the
sole members of which are the disabled veteran who uses the dwelling as his
or her principal place of residence or the disabled veteran who uses the
dwelling as his or her principal place of residence and his or her spouse;
and
(B) “Personal property” means only those items of tangible
personal property used that are:
(i) Used for other than a commercial or business
purpose; and
(ii) Registered in the name of the disabled veteran.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-3-306(b), concerning the property tax
exemption for disabled veterans and the surviving spouses and minor dependent
children of disabled veterans, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(3) A disabled veteran eligible for the exemption provided in
this section and desiring to claim an exemption with respect to property
described under:
(A) Subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii)(b)(2) of this section shall
furnish to the county collector a signed, notarized, and file-marked copy of
the irrevocable trust; or
04-02-2025 09:58:19 JLL307

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1809
(B) Subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii)(b)(3) of this section shall
furnish to the county collector the proof of eligibility required under § 26-
26-1118(b)(2)(A)(ii).

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

/s/Warren




























04-02-2025 09:58:19 JLL307